Utah statutes.
76-8-903.   Assembly for advocating criminal syndicalism or sabotage.
The assembly or consorting of two or more persons for the purpose of
advocating, teaching, or suggesting the doctrine of criminal syndicalism, or
to advocate, teach, suggest or encourage sabotage, or the duty, necessity,
propriety or expediency of doing any act of violence, the destruction of or
damage to any property, the bodily injury to any person, or the commission of
any crime or unlawful act as a means of accomplishing or effecting any
industrial or political ends, change or revolution, is hereby declared
unlawful, and every person voluntarily participating therein, or by his
presence aiding and instigating the same is guilty of a felony of the third
degree.
